Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202687-1406
Agricultural data; contract or agreement; requirements.

(1) Beginning on January 1, 2027, every new contract or agreement involving the collection or processing of agricultural data in this state shall contain a specific provision stating that the controller or processor is prohibited from engaging in the sale of such agricultural data without the express written consent of the agricultural producer.

(2) Any contract provision that waives or limits the requirements of the Agricultural Data Privacy Act is contrary to public policy and is void and unenforceable.

Laws 2026, LB525, § 6.
July 18, 2026